Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.15, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Exemptions from immunizations. (a) If a person is at least seven years old and has not been immunized against pertussis, the person must not be required to be immunized against pertussis. (b) If a person is at least 18 years old and has not completed a series of immunizations against poliomyelitis, the person must not be required to be immunized against poliomyelitis. (c) If a statement, signed by a physician, is submitted to the administrator or other person having general control and supervision of the school or child care facility stating that an immunization is contraindicated for medical reasons or that laboratory confirmation of the presence of adequate immunity exists, the immunization specified in the statement need not be required. (d) If a deleted text begin notarizeddeleted text end statementnew text begin ,new text end signed by the minor child's parent or guardian or by the emancipated person new text begin and signed by the provider of the child or emancipated person verifying compliance with the requirements in subdivision 3c, new text end is submitted to the administrator or other person having general control and supervision of the school or child care facility stating that the person has not been immunized as prescribed in subdivision 1 because of the conscientiously held beliefs of the parent or guardian of the minor child or of the emancipated person, the immunizations specified in the statement shall not be required. new text begin The signature of the minor child's parent or guardian or of the emancipated person on this statement must be notarized. new text end This statement must also be forwarded to the commissioner of the Department of Health. This paragraph does not applynew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end to a child enrolling or enrolled in a child care center or family child care program that adopts a policy under subdivision 3bnew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) in the circumstances specified in subdivision 3e, paragraphs (a) and (b)new text end . (e) If the person is under 15 months, the person is not required to be immunized against measles, rubella, or mumps. (f) If a person is at least five years old and has not been immunized against haemophilus influenzae type b, the person is not required to be immunized against haemophilus influenzae type b. (g) If a person who is not a Minnesota resident enrolls in a Minnesota school online learning course or program that delivers instruction to the person only by computer and does not provide any teacher or instructor contact time or require classroom attendance, the person is not subject to the immunization, statement, and other requirements of this section. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.15, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Educational consultation with provider. new text end new text begin (a) A parent or guardian of a minor child, or an emancipated person, seeking an exemption from an immunization under subdivision 3, paragraph (d), must complete an educational consultation with the child's or emancipated person's provider. In the educational consultation, the provider must: new text end new text begin (1) review with the minor child's parent or guardian or with the emancipated person information about the risks and benefits of immunizations that is consistent with information on immunizations provided by the commissioner of health or by an organization recommended by the commissioner of health; and new text end new text begin (2) verify that the minor child's parent or guardian or the emancipated person reviewed the immunizations education module made available by the commissioner of health according to subdivision 3d. new text end new text begin (b) Upon completion of the educational consultation under paragraph (a), the provider must sign the statement of exemption under subdivision 3, paragraph (d), if so requested by the minor child's parent or guardian or by the emancipated person. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.15, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3d. new text end new text begin Immunizations education module. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must develop and make available an immunizations education module on the risks and benefits of immunizations. The commissioner must determine the content, delivery format, and length of the education module. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.15, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3e. new text end new text begin Disease outbreak. new text end new text begin (a) In the event of an outbreak in this state of a disease for which immunization is required under this section or Minnesota Rules, chapter 4604, the commissioner of health may issue a written determination that: new text end new text begin (1) an outbreak of such a disease is taking place in this state; new text end new text begin (2) the disease is likely to be transmitted to children and adults in schools, child care facilities, or both; and new text end new text begin (3) the disease has the potential to cause death or serious injury to children or adults exposed in schools or child care facilities or to others who may become infected through contact with these children or adults. new text end new text begin (b) Upon issuance of the determination in paragraph (a), an elementary or secondary school or child care facility may exclude a minor child or emancipated person who submitted a statement of exemption under subdivision 3, paragraph (d), for the disease specified in the commissioner's determination. For a minor child or emancipated person subject to exclusion under this paragraph to attend or return to an elementary or secondary school or child care facility, the minor child's parent or guardian or the emancipated person must submit to the administrator or person having general control and supervision of the school or child care facility: new text end new text begin (1) documentation that the minor child or emancipated person has been immunized against the disease specified in the commissioner's determination consistent with medically acceptable standards; or new text end new text begin (2) a statement of exemption under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), (c), (e), or (f), for the disease specified in the commissioner's determination. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must issue a written determination when the commissioner finds that the disease outbreak for which a determination was issued under paragraph (a) no longer meets one or more of the conditions listed in paragraph (a). A determination issued under this paragraph terminates an elementary or secondary school's or child care facility's exclusion authority under paragraph (b). new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.15, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Definitions. deleted text begin As used indeleted text end new text begin For purposes ofnew text end this sectionnew text begin ,new text end the following terms have the meanings given deleted text begin themdeleted text end . (a) "Elementary or secondary school" includes any public school as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9, 11, 13, and 17, or nonpublic school, church, or religious organization, or home school in which a child is provided instruction in compliance with sections 120A.22 and 120A.24. (b) "Person enrolled in any elementary or secondary school" means a person born after 1956 and enrolled in deleted text begin gradesdeleted text end kindergarten through new text begin grade new text end 12, and a child with a disability receiving special instruction and services as required in sections 125A.03 to 125A.24 and 125A.65, excluding a child being provided services at the home or bedside of the child or in other states. (c) "Child care facility" includes those child care programs subject to licensure under chapter 142B, and Minnesota Rules, chapters 9502 and 9503. (d) "Family child care" means child care for no more than ten children at one time of which no more than six are under school age. The licensed capacity must include all children of any caregiver when the children are present in the residence. (e) "Group family child care" means child care for no more than 14 children at any one time. The total number of children includes all children of any caregiver when the children are present in the residence. new text begin (f) "Medically acceptable standards" means immunization recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics. new text end new text begin (g) "Provider" means a licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse as defined in section 148.171, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health to develop and make available an immunizations education module according to Minnesota Statutes, section 121A.15, subdivision 3d. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end